Washington statutes.
RCW 43.320.530

Financial institution service providers—Confidentiality of reports of examination.

A service provider report of examination written or obtained by the director is confidential and subject to the applicable state and federal bank confidentiality laws including, but not limited to, RCW 30A.04.075, 31.12.565, 32.04.220, and 33.04.110, provided that:

(1) For any joint service provider report of examination performed by the director with any other state or federal agency, a copy may be furnished to:

(a) The examined service provider or the covered financial institutions serviced by the service provider in accordance with the bank service company act, 12 U.S.C. chapter 18, and the attendant rules, regulations, policies, and guidance applicable to service provider examinations;

(b) Outside parties with written consent of all state and federal agencies that participated in the examination; or

(c) Outside parties if compelled in response to a valid legal process; however, the department must provide a written notice of disclosure and reasonable opportunity to object to all state and federal agencies that participated in the examination.

(2) For any state-only service provider report of examination performed solely by the director, a copy may be furnished to:

(a) The examined service provider;

(b) Any Washington state-chartered or Washington state-licensed financial institution serviced by the service provider; or

(c) Outside parties if compelled in response to a valid legal process with reasonable opportunity for the department to object.

[ 2022 c 49 s 4.]